tests/russian.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Vowel harmony in Russian words, -ство": 
    искусство<n><sg><nom> : искусство
    искусство<n><sg><par> : искусствота
    искусство<n><sg><dat> : искусствоҕа
    искусство<n><sg><acc> : искусствоны
    искусство<n><sg><abl> : искусствоттан
    искусство<n><sg><ins> : искусствонан

    искусство<n><sg><px3sg><nom> : искусствота
    искусство<n><sg><px3sg><par> : искусствотына
    искусство<n><sg><px3sg><dat> : искусствотыгар
    искусство<n><sg><px3sg><acc> : искусствотын
    искусство<n><sg><px3sg><abl> : искусствотыттан
    искусство<n><sg><px3sg><ins> : искусствотынан

  "Vowel harmony in Russian words, -ение":
    отделение<n><sg><nom> : отделение
    отделение<n><sg><par> : отделениета
    отделение<n><sg><dat> : отделениеҕа
    отделение<n><sg><acc> : отделениены
    отделение<n><sg><abl> : отделениеттан
    отделение<n><sg><ins> : отделениенан

    отделение<n><sg><px3sg><nom> : отделениета
    отделение<n><sg><px3sg><par> : отделениетына
    отделение<n><sg><px3sg><dat> : отделениетыгар
    отделение<n><sg><px3sg><acc> : отделениетын
    отделение<n><sg><px3sg><abl> : отделениетыттан
    отделение<n><sg><px3sg><ins> : отделениетынан

  "Final voiced consonants are unvoiced":
    колхоз<n><sg><nom> : колхоз
    колхоз<n><sg><dat> : колхозка
    колхоз<n><pl><nom> : колхозтар
    колхоз<n><pl><dat> : колхозтарга

  "Vowel harmony in Russian words: е followed by cons":
    университет<n><sg><nom> : университет
    университет<n><sg><dat> : университетка
    университет<n><sg><dat> : университеткэ
    университет<n><pl><nom> : университеттар
    университет<n><pl><dat> : университеттарга
    университет<n><sg><px3sg><dat> : университетыгар
    университет<n><sg><px3sg><acc> : университетын

  "Russian loans ending in consonant cluster with т":
    департамент<n><sg><nom> : департамент
    департамент<n><sg><par> : департамента
    департамент<n><sg><px3sg><nom> : департамена
    коммунист<n><sg><nom> : коммунист
    коммунист<n><pl><nom> : коммунистар
    субъект<n><sg><nom> : субъект
    субъект<n><sg><px3sg><nom> : субъега
    субъект<n><pl><nom> : субъектар
